Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 4

Telephone Solicitation and Number Portability

65-4-401. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Caller identification service” means telephone service which notifies telephone subscribers of the telephone number of incoming telephone calls;

“Commission” means the Tennessee public utility commission;

“Local exchange company” includes telecommunications service providers as defined in § 65-4-101, competing telecommunications service providers as such term is defined in § 65-4-101, telephone cooperatives, and cellular or other wireless telecommunications providers;

“Person” means a natural person, individual, partnership, corporation, trust, estate, incorporated or unincorporated association and any other legal or commercial entity however organized and wherever located that telemarkets to citizens located within the state of Tennessee;

“Residential subscriber” means a person who has subscribed to residential telephone service from a local exchange company or the other persons living, residing or visiting with such person; and

“Telephone solicitation” means any voice communication over a telephone originating from Tennessee or elsewhere that:

Promotes or encourages, directly or indirectly, the purchase of, rental of, or investment in property, goods, or services;

Refers a residential subscriber to another person for the purpose of promoting or encouraging the purchase of, rental of, or investment in property, goods, or services; or

Requests a charitable contribution except as provided for in subdivision (6)(B)(ii);

“Telephone solicitation” does not include voice communications to any residential subscriber:

With that subscriber's prior express permission;

If the communication is made by a bona fide member, volunteer or direct employee of a not-for-profit organization exempt from paying taxes under § 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)), provided the voice communication is made to request a charitable contribution to be used solely for such not-for-profit organization's exempt purpose;

Who is an existing customer. For the purposes of this part, an “existing customer” includes a residential subscriber with whom the person or entity making a telephone solicitation has had a prior relationship within the prior twelve (12) months; or

If the communication is made on behalf of a business and all of the following conditions are met:

A direct employee of the business makes the voice communication;

The communication is not made as part of a telecommunications marketing plan;

The business has a reasonable belief that the specific person who is receiving the voice communication is considering purchasing the service or product sold or leased by the business and the call is specifically directed to such person;

The business does not sell or engage in telemarketing services; and

The business does not make more than a total of three (3) such voice communications in any one (1) calendar week.

Acts 1999, ch. 478, § 1; 2001, ch. 422, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment replaced the former definition of “authority” which read: “‘Authority’ means the Tennessee regulatory authority;” with the present definition of “commission”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-402. Identity of caller — Authorized times for solicitation.

Any person or entity who makes a telephone solicitation to any residential subscriber in this state shall, at the beginning of such call, state clearly the identity of the person initiating the call and entity or organization such person represents. Without the permission of the residential subscriber, no person or entity who makes a telephone solicitation shall call such subscriber at any time other than between the hours of eight o'clock a.m. (8:00 a.m.) to nine o'clock p.m. (9:00 p.m.), prevailing time.

Acts 1999, ch. 478, § 2.

65-4-403. Circumvention of caller identification service prohibited.

No person or entity who makes a telephone solicitation to the telephone of a residential subscriber in this state shall knowingly utilize any method to block or otherwise circumvent such subscriber's use of a caller identification service.

Acts 1999, ch. 478, § 3.

65-4-404. Calls to persons objecting to solicitation.

No person or entity shall knowingly make or cause to be made any telephone solicitation to any residential subscriber in this state who has given notice to the commission, in accordance with regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, of such subscriber's objection to receiving telephone solicitations.

Acts 1999, ch. 478, § 4; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” near the middle of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-405. Database of persons objecting to solicitation — Regulations — Enforcement actions.

The commission shall establish and provide for the operation of a database to compile a list of telephone numbers of residential subscribers who object to receiving telephone solicitations. It shall be the duty of the commission to have such database in operation no later than May 1, 2000. Such database may be operated by the commission or by another entity under contract with the commission.

No later than January 1, 2000, the commission shall promulgate regulations which:

Require each local exchange company to semi-annually inform its residential subscribers of the opportunity to provide notification to the commission or its contractor that such subscriber objects to receiving telephone solicitations;

Specify the methods by which each residential subscriber may give notice to the commission or its contractor of such subscriber's objection to receiving such solicitations or revocation of such notice;

Specify the length of time for which a notice of objection shall be effective and the effect of a change of telephone number on such notice;

Specify the methods by which such objections and revocations shall be collected and added to the database;

Specify the methods by which any person or entity desiring to make telephone solicitations will obtain access to the database as required to avoid calling the telephone numbers of residential subscribers included in the database; and

Specify such other matters that the commission deems necessary to implement this part.

If, pursuant to 47 U.S.C. § 227(c)(3), the federal communications commission establishes a single national database of telephone numbers of subscribers who object to receiving telephone solicitations, the commission shall include the part of such single national database that relates to Tennessee in the database established under this part.

A person or entity desiring to make telephone solicitations to any residential subscriber shall pay to the commission by certified check or money order, on or before March 15, 2000, an annual registration fee of five hundred dollars ($500) to defray regulatory and enforcement expenses. Such annual registration fee shall allow access to the Do Not Call Register compiled from the database established under this part; such registration and access shall be limited to the time period April 1, 2000 until June 30, 2001, or any part thereof. Thereafter, the registration deadline and annual time period shall be determined by rule duly promulgated by the commission.

Unlimited electronic copies of the Do Not Call Register shall be available to persons or entities upon their payment of the annual registration fee. A fee shall be established by rule of the commission for paper copies of the Do Not Call Register.

Fifteen (15) days after the registration deadline, the non-payment of any required fee is a violation of this part. The telephone solicitation of any residential subscriber listed in the Do Not Call Register compiled from the database established under this part, by any person or entity who is not duly registered and who is not otherwise exempted by law, is a violation of this part.

As used in this subsection (d), “entity” includes any parent, subsidiary, or affiliate of a person.

Information contained in the database established under this part shall not be subject to public inspection or disclosure under title 10, chapter 7. Such information shall be used only for the purpose of compliance with this part or in a proceeding or action under this part.

The commission is authorized to initiate proceedings relative to a violation of this part or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part. Such proceedings include without limitation proceedings to issue a cease and desist order, to issue an order imposing a civil penalty up to a maximum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each knowing violation, and to seek additional relief in any court of competent jurisdiction. Each violation shall be calculated in a liberal manner to deter violations and to protect consumers. Each violation may include each telephone solicitation made to a residential subscriber that was on the list that the violator telephoned. The commission is authorized to issue investigative demands, issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and conduct hearings in the course of investigating a violation of this part, in accordance with this title. All civil penalties assessed pursuant to this part shall be deposited in the public utilities account in the state treasury.

No later than January 1, 2000, the commission shall hold a hearing to receive testimony from entities subject to this part who employ independent contractors to make telephone solicitations to determine if the commission should authorize such independent contractors to access the database at a reduced fee. The commission is authorized to allow such access and develop a fee schedule for access to the database by independent contractors and the entity which employs such contractors.

As supplementary to the authority granted in this part, the attorney general and reporter, at the request of the commission, may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the state against any person or entity relative to a violation of this part or any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part. The courts are authorized to issue orders and injunctions to restrain and prevent violations of this part, and such orders and injunctions shall be issued without bond. In any action commenced by the state, the courts are authorized to order reasonable attorneys' fees and investigative costs be paid by the violator to the state. An action brought by the attorney general and reporter may also include other causes of action such as but not limited to a claim under the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1.

Upon request of any person, the commission shall initiate a rulemaking proceeding establishing the rules pursuant to which a registrant may share the Do Not Call Register with persons affiliated with the registrant as an independent contractor or member.

On and after January 1, 2012, for purposes of this section, “residential subscriber” also means a state government telephone subscriber.

Acts 1999, ch. 478, § 5; 2000, ch. 729, §§ 1-4; 2011, ch. 177, § 2; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Note. For the National Do Not Call Registry, see https://www.donotcall.gov. For Tennessee implementation of the Do Not Call Program, see http://www.tn.gov/tra/donotcall.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The commission” for “The authority” and “the commission” for “the authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Providing telephone numbers in the Tennessee Do-Not-Call Register to the Federal Trade Commission, OAG 03-082, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 99 (6/25/03).

65-4-406. Remedies not exclusive.

The remedies, duties, prohibitions, and penalties of this part are not exclusive and are in addition to the Consumer Telemarketing Protection Act of 1990, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 15, and all other causes of action, remedies, and penalties provided by law.

Acts 1999, ch. 478, § 6.

65-4-407. Liability of caller identification service providers.

No provider of telephone caller identification service shall be held liable for violations of this part committed by other persons or entities.

Acts 1999, ch. 478, § 7.

65-4-408. Defenses.

It shall be a defense in any action or proceeding brought under this part that the defendant has established and implemented, with due care, reasonable practices and procedures to effectively prevent telephone solicitations in violation of this part.

Acts 1999, ch. 478, § 8.

65-4-409. Portability of telephone number.

The local exchange company shall provide notice to the customer at the time the customer signs up for new service of the availability of number portability of the customer's telephone number.

Acts 2006, ch. 769, § 1.

65-4-410. Do Not Call Register.

Residential telephone subscribers may enroll on the Tennessee Do Not Call Register in the manner prescribed by the commission. Enrollment shall take effect thirty (30) days following the first day of the succeeding month of enrollment by the subscriber.

State government telephone subscribers may enroll on the Tennessee Do Not Call Register in a manner prescribed by the commission; provided, that only the administrative head, or such person's designee, for each state department, agency, board, commission and other entity of the state, including the legislative branch and the judicial branch, may designate telephone numbers for such department, agency, board, commission or other entity of the state to be enrolled on the register. Enrollment shall take effect thirty (30) days following the first succeeding month of enrollment.

Acts 2006, ch. 769, § 2; 2011, ch. 177, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Note. For the National Do Not Call Registry, see https://www.donotcall.gov. For Tennessee implementation of the Do Not Call Program, see http://www.tn.gov/tra/donotcall.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” at the end of the first sentence in (a) and preceding the proviso in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.